Washington statutes.
RCW 10.61.003

Degree offenses—Inferior degree—Attempt.

Upon an indictment or information for an offense consisting of different degrees, the jury may find the defendant not guilty of the degree charged in the indictment or information, and guilty of any degree inferior thereto, or of an attempt to commit the offense.

[ 1891 c 28 s 75; Code 1881 s 1097; 1854 p 120 s 122; RRS s 2167. Formerly RCW 10.61.010, part.] [SLC-RO-11]

NOTES:

Where doubt as to degree, conviction of lowest: RCW 10.58.020.